Louisiana, session 2026, SB72.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:707.2(A), (C)(1), and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 32:702(18), 705(B)(6) and (7), 707.2(I) and (J), 707.2.1, and 707.2.2 are hereby enacted
to read as follows:
§702. Definitions
As used in this Chapter:
* * *
(18) "Certificate of title" means the record that is evidence of ownership
of a motor vehicle, whether paper or electronic, issued by the department.
* * *
§705. Acceptance and delivery of certificate
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, an "endorsement" means one of the
following:
* * *
(6) The electronic signature of the seller affixed to an electronic record
of assignment or transfer of title in a manner authorized by the department,
Page 1 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 72 ENROLLED
consistent with the provisions of the Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, R.S.
9:2601 et seq. The electronic signatures shall comply with the Identity
Assurance Level 2 (IAL2) security standard when required by federal law or
regulation, as defined in the National Institute of Standards and Technology
Special Publication 800-63A.
(7) An electronic signature of the seller affixed through an electronic
titling system or other electronic process approved by the department, which
shall have the same force and effect as a handwritten signature and
endorsement executed pursuant to Paragraph (1) or (2) of this Subsection.
* * *
§707.2. Electronic media system for lien recordation; vehicle titling and
registration; participation requirements; fees; required bond;
confidentiality of information; rules and regulations
A. The department shall develop and implement on a statewide basis no later
than January 1, 2010, a computer system which will permit the electronic recording
of information concerning the perfection and release of vehicle security interests
without submitting or receiving the paper title documents including electronic lien,
electronic titling, and electronic registration. The department may shall allow the
submission of vehicle title information for new, transferred, and corrected
certificates of title, including the perfection and release of security interests, through
electronic media means in a cost-effective manner in lieu of the submission and
maintenance of paper documents otherwise required by this Chapter. The system
shall enable the ability to transact, process, record, and transmit certificates of
title and to record and release liens through a completely electronic process for
the following users:
(1) All business entities and their service providers applying for
automotive titles and registrations, for itself or the customers.
(2) All federally insured depository institutions, their affiliates and
subsidiaries, other lenders, and their public tag agents and other service
providers.
Page 2 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 72 ENROLLED
* * *
C.(1) An approved public license tag agent operating a secured host computer
system interfacing with the computer system of the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, office of motor vehicles, and the computer system of a lending
institution or other sales finance company shall be bonded in an amount specified by
the department. The public license tag agent is hereby authorized to charge a fee to
customers utilizing this electronic media system.
(2) Each federally insured depository institution that originates more than two
hundred fifty twenty-five motor vehicle transactions per year, and each finance
company, lending institution, or other lender shall designate a public tag agent with
which such bank, finance company, lending institution, or other lender shall interface
its computer system for the purpose of receiving electronic confirmation from the
department, of the receipt and the filing of the security interest on the subject motor
vehicle. Each federally insured depository institution that originates more than two
hundred fifty twenty-five motor vehicle transactions per year, and each finance
company, lending institution, or other lender shall also designate such public tag
agent when transmitting a release or satisfaction of its lien.
* * *
D. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a written or printed report
of an electronic media transaction or recording required under the provisions of this
Section, if certified as true and correct by the department, shall serve as evidence of
any signature, acknowledgment, or information which was provided to or by the
department through electronic means, and the certification shall be admissible in any
legal proceeding as evidence of the facts stated therein.
* * *
I. Any lienholder using the department's electronic lien and electronic
titling system, directly or through a public tag agent, to release a lien
encumbering an electronic certificate of title shall process the electronic lien
release within five business days after the lienholder has been paid in full and
the payoff funds are deemed by the lienholder to be collected. The
Page 3 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 72 ENROLLED
requirements of this Subsection shall not apply to paper certificates of title,
which shall be governed by R.S. 32:708.
J.(1) Beginning twelve months after January 1, 2028, or the date the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, certifies
that a fully operational statewide electronic, lien, electronic titling, and
electronic registration system has been implemented, whichever occurs sooner,
any person who, in the regular course of business, submits applications for
certificates of title, registration, lien recordings, lien satisfactions, or other
documents to the department in connection with motor vehicle transactions
shall submit those applications through the system, subject to such exceptions
as the department may provide by rule.
(2) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act establishing definitions, operational
standards, performance requirements, compliance criteria, and reporting
requirements for electronic lien and title, electronic vehicle registration, and
electronic registration and titling systems.
§707.2.1. Electronic signatures and records for motor vehicle transactions
A. Any document, record, or instrument required in connection with the
sale, lease, transfer, titling, registration, or financing of a motor vehicle may be
created, executed, transmitted, and stored electronically, including but not
limited to the following:
(1) Titling documents.
(2) Registration applications.
(3) Odometer disclosure forms.
(4) Secure and limited powers of attorney.
(5) Attestations.
B. Any documents used to transfer ownership of a vehicle to an
insurance company after payment of damages may be signed electronically and
reproduced in paper form and shall not require notarization. The supporting
documents include but are not limited to the following:
Page 4 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 72 ENROLLED
(1) Limited powers of attorney.
(2) Applications for duplicate titles.
(3) Odometer disclosure forms.
C.(1) Electronic signatures shall comply with the Identity Assurance
Level 2 (IAL2) security standard when required by federal law or regulation as
defined in the National Institute of Standards and Technology Special
Publication 800-63A.
(2) An electronic signature or electronic record accepted by the
department pursuant to this Section, including a legibly scanned or imaged copy
of a signed document, shall have the same force and effect as a handwritten
signature or original paper document, shall satisfy any legal requirement for a
written signature or record, shall not require notarization, and shall be
admissible for all legal and evidentiary purposes to the same extent as a
handwritten signature or original paper document.
D.(1) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall accept electronic records and electronic signatures for the
documents and records identified in Subsections A and B of this Section and any
electronic signature or electronic record accepted by the department pursuant
to this Section shall have the same force and effect as an original written
document or handwritten signature and shall satisfy any legal requirement for
a written record or signature.
(2) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act as may be necessary to implement the
provisions of this Section, including but not limited to rules governing:
(a) Electronic signatures and authentication standards.
(b) Security and identity verification procedures.
E.(1) A dealer or authorized officer as set forth in R.S. 32:702 using an
approved system in good faith and without actual knowledge of fraud or
unauthorized access shall be immune from civil liability arising solely from the
use of electronic signatures, remote notarization of powers of attorney or
Page 5 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 72 ENROLLED
electronic records, including claims alleging improper execution, authentication,
or transmission, provided the dealer or authorized officer complied with the
requirements of this Section and any rules promulgated by the department.
(2) The immunity provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall
not apply to intentional misconduct or gross negligence.
§707.2.2. Secure digital motor vehicle titles
A. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall implement, or authorize the use of, a secure, interoperable system
that offers vehicle title holders a fully paperless, secure digital vehicle title that
may be issued in lieu of a paper certificate of title, including the ability for such
title to be made available to the title holder through a department-approved or
state-authorized digital credential platform.
B. Once implemented, the secure digital title system shall:
(1) Include all functions related to title reassignments.
(2) Meet or exceed applicable security requirements as set forth in
regulations promulgated by the department.
(3) Provide title holders with online, real-time access to motor vehicle
titles and status of titles in process.
(4) Support secure interoperability with department-approved systems,
including approved digital credential platforms, dealer service providers,
financial institution service providers, and verification services, through
standards-based interfaces, application programming interfaces, or other
methods approved by the department.
C. A secure digital vehicle title produced under this Section shall be
regarded as an official title from the state of Louisiana and fully recognized
legally for any motor vehicle related transactions within the state and all other
United States jurisdictions.
D. The secure digital title system shall permit the electronic transfer,
reassignment, and recording of ownership of a motor vehicle. Ownership
transfers executed through an approved electronic title system shall have the
Page 6 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 72 ENROLLED
same legal effect as transfers executed through a paper certificate of title.
Licensed motor vehicle dealers may complete title assignments, reassignments
of ownership, and related documents through the electronic system without
requiring issuance of a paper certificate of title.
E. A duly certified copy of the office of motor vehicle's secure digital title
shall be admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding in this
state as evidence of the existence of the title.
F. The commissioner of the office of motor vehicles shall promulgate any
rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this Section. Any
rules promulgated under this Section shall be designed to promote competition,
transparency, interoperability, and consumer choice, subject to security,
privacy, and technical standards established by the department. The
department shall not require a title holder, dealer, lender, insurer, or other
authorized user to use a specific proprietary application to access, present, or
verify a secure digital title where a department-approved interoperable
alternative meeting the department's security, privacy, and technical standards
is available.
G. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to grant any vendor,
contractor, system integrator, or operator of the department's system of record
the exclusive right to display, present, verify, or otherwise make available to
residents a digital wallet, identity verification, electronic signature, verifier
services, or other resident-facing services related to secure digital vehicle titles.
The department shall remain the sole issuer of secure digital vehicle titles. The
department may authorize one or more qualified providers, including approved
digital credential platforms and verification services, to perform resident-facing
display, presentation, or verification functions, subject to security, privacy,
audit, and interoperability requirements established by the department.
H. The department shall remain the authoritative source of all title
records. Any display, presentation, verification, or use of a secure digital title
through an approved digital credential platform shall not alter the department's
Page 7 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 72 ENROLLED
ownership or control of the authoritative title record and shall be subject to
technical standards and business requirements established by the department.
I. A secure digital title issued pursuant to this Section may be verified
through a department-approved digital verification service, provided such
service meets security, privacy, audit, and interoperability requirements
established by the department.
Section 2. R.S. 32:707.2(G) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3.(A) The provisions of R.S. 32:705(B)(6) and (7), R.S. 32:707.2(A), (C)(1),
(D), (I), and (J), and R.S. 32:707.2.1, as enacted or amended by this Act, shall become
effective on January 1, 2028, or on the date the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
office of motor vehicles, certifies that a fully operational statewide electronic lien, electronic
titling, and electronic registration system has been implemented, whichever occurs sooner.
(B) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to invalidate or limit any electronic
record, electronic signature, or electronic transaction otherwise authorized by law or by
policy of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, prior
to the effective date of this Section.
(C) The provisions of R.S. 32:707.2.2, as enacted by this Act, shall become effective
on the date the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles,
certifies that the secure digital title system required by R.S. 32:707.2.2 has been
implemented and is operational, or January 1, 2031, whichever occurs sooner.
Section 4. R.S. 32:702(18), the repeal of R.S. 32:707.2(G), and Sections 5 and 6 of
this Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not signed by the
governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the
governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed
by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, those provisions shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Section 5. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof, is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications of the Act which can be
given effect without the invalid provision, item, or application and to this end the provisions
of this Act are hereby declared severable.
Page 8 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 72 ENROLLED
Section 6. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
arrange in alphabetical order and renumber the definitions provided in R.S. 32:702.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 9 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.